Washington statutes.
RCW 11.90.460

Application of the federal electronic signatures in global and national commerce act.

This chapter modifies, limits, and supersedes the federal electronic signatures in global and national commerce act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 7001, et seq., but does not modify, limit, or supersede section 101(c) of that act, 15 U.S.C. 7001(c), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in section 103(b) of that act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 7003(b).

[ 2009 c 81 s 22.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2009 c 81: See note following RCW 11.90.010.